Tennessee, session 114, HB1505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-393, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the retail sale of firearms
and ammunition, if sold between 12:01 a.m. on July 3, 2026, and 11:59 p.m. on July 6,
2026.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1505
010965
- 1 -